Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the  Department of Education, for the biennium
beginning July 1,  2017, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the following
purposes:
(1) Operations.................................  $ 77,167,794
(2) Oregon School for the Deaf ...... $ 12,317,072
SECTION 2. There are appropriated to the  Department of Education, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2017, out  of the General Fund, the following amounts, which are to be dis-
tributed as grants-in-aid, for program costs and to purchase  services, for the following pur-
poses:
(1) Early intervention services
and early childhood special
education programs .................. $175,014,948
(2) Other special education
programs................................... $ 48,980,693
(3) Nutrition programs ................... $ 2,090,517
(4) Other K-12 grant-in-aid
programs................................... $ 51,634,644
(5) Oregon prekindergarten
program .................................... $152,334,645
(6) Other early learning
programs................................... $ 95,606,056
(7) Youth development programs ... $ 13,151,091
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses, other than expenses described in sections 6 and 10 of this 2017  Act, from fees,
moneys or other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and
federal funds, collected or received by the Department of Education, for the following  pur-
poses:
(1) Operations................................. $ 39,120,017
Enrolled Senate Bill 5516 (SB 5516-A) Page 1
(2) Oregon School for the Deaf ...... $ 6,025,702
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds, other than those described in sections 5 and 10 of this  2017
Act, collected or received by the Department of Education, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 80,093,895
(2) Oregon School for the Deaf ...... $ 264,004
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for payment
of grants-in-aid, program costs and purchased services from federal funds, other than  those
described in sections 4 and 10 of this  2017 Act, received by the Department of Education, for
the following purposes:
(1) Early learning programs ........... $121,035,508
(2) Youth development programs ... $ 750,000
(3) All other grants ........................ $851,958,120
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for payment
of grants-in-aid, program costs and purchased services from fees, moneys or  other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds, collected or
received by the Department of Education for programs other than those  specified in sections
3 and 10 of this 2017 Act, for the following purposes:
(1) Early learning programs ........... $ 11,580,868
(2) Youth development programs ... $ 6,281,409
(3) All other grants ........................ $102,588,037
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $651,225
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses by the Department of Education  from lottery moneys allocated from the Oregon
Education Fund to the  department for debt service on outstanding state education lottery
bonds.
SECTION 8.
There is appropriated to the Department  of Education, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount of $19,851,315 for  debt service
on Article XI-P general obligation bonds.
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding section 2, chapter 1, Oregon Laws 2017 (Ballot  Measure 98
(2016)), there is appropriated to the Department of Education,  for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2017, out  of the General Fund, the amount of $170,000,000 for deposit in the High
School Graduation and College and Career Readiness Fund.
SECTION 10. For the biennium beginning July  1, 2017, the following expenditures by the
Department of Education are not limited:
(1) Moneys  from the School Lunch Revolving Account, Education Training Revolving
Account and Common School Fund; and
(2) Expenditures for grants-in-aid and purchased services from federal funds received  by
the Department of Education from the United States Department of Agriculture.
SECTION 11. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5516 (SB 5516-A) Page 2
Passed by Senate July 6, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House July 7, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5516 (SB 5516-A) Page 3